California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The names of the regional center and the licensee.

(b) A requirement that the contractor shall comply with all applicable statutes and regulations, including Section 4681.1.

(c) The effective date and termination date of the contract.

(d) The definition of terms.

(e) A requirement that the execution of any amendment or modification to the
 contract be in accordance with all applicable federal and state statutes and regulations and be by mutual agreement of both parties.

(f) A requirement that the licensee and the agents and employees of the licensee, in the performance of the contract, shall act in an independent capacity, and not as officers or employees or agents of the regional center.

(g) A requirement that the assignment of the contract for consumer services shall not be allowed.

(h) The rate of payment per consumer.

(i) Incorporation, by reference, of the ARFPSHN’s or the GHCSHN’s approved program plan.

(j) A
 requirement that the contractor verify, and maintain for the duration of the project, possession of commercial general liability insurance in the amount of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence.

(k) Contractor performance criteria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 38.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.63.

(a) Each ARFPSHN and each GHCSHN shall do all of the following:

(1) Meet the minimum requirements for a Residential Facility Service Level 4-i pursuant to Sections 56004 and 56013 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, and ensure that all of the following conditions are met:

(A) That a licensed registered nurse, licensed vocational nurse, or licensed psychiatric technician, is awake and on duty 24-hours per day, seven days per week.

(B) That a licensed registered nurse is awake and on duty at least eight hours per
 person, per week.

(C) That at least two staff on the premises are awake and on duty if providing care to four or more consumers.

(2) Ensure the consumer remains under the care of a physician at all times and is examined by the primary care physician at least once every 60 days, or more often if required by the consumer’s individual health care plan.

(3) Ensure that an administrator is on duty at least 20 hours per week to ensure the effective operation of the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN.

(4) For an ARFPSHN, ensure that the administrator completes the 35-hour administrator certification training program pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1562.3 of the Health and Safety Code without exception, has at least one year of administrative and supervisory experience in a licensed residential program for persons with developmental disabilities, and is one or more of the following:

(A) A licensed registered nurse.

(B) A licensed nursing home administrator.

(C) A licensed psychiatric technician with at least five years of experience serving individuals with developmental disabilities.

(D) An individual with a bachelors degree or more advanced degree in the health or human services field and two years of experience working in a licensed residential program for persons with developmental disabilities and special health care needs.

(5) For a GHCSHN, ensure that the administrator completes
 the 40-hour administrator certification training program pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1522.41 of the Health and Safety Code without exception, has at least one year of administrative and supervisory experience in a licensed residential program for persons with developmental disabilities, and is one or more of the following:

(A) A licensed registered nurse.

(B) A licensed nursing home administrator.

(C) A licensed psychiatric technician with at least five years of
 experience serving individuals with developmental disabilities.

(D) An individual with a bachelors degree or more advanced degree in the health or human services field and two years of experience working in a licensed residential program for persons with developmental disabilities and special health care needs.

(b) The regional center shall require an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN to provide additional professional, administrative, or supportive personnel whenever the regional center determines, in consultation with the individual health care plan team, that additional personnel are needed to provide for the health and safety of consumers.

(c) Each ARFPSHN and each GHCSHN shall ensure that all direct care personnel complete the training requirements specified in Section 4695.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 39.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.65.

(a) A regional center shall not place, or fund the placement for, any consumer in an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN unless the following requirements are met:

(1) The
 individual health care plan team has prepared a written individual health care plan that can be fully and immediately implemented upon the consumer’s placement.

(2) For placements in a GHCSHN, the regional center considers and documents every possible way to assist the child’s family or guardian to maintain the child in the home of the family or guardian, or return the child to the home of the family or guardian, when living at home is the preferred objective in the child’s individual program plan.

(b) (1) An ARFPSHN and GHCSHN shall only accept, for initial admission, consumers who meet both of the following requirements:

(A) Reside in a developmental center at the time of the proposed placement.

(B) Have an individual program plan that specifies special health care and intensive support needs that indicate the appropriateness of placement in an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), if a vacancy in an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN occurs due to the permanent relocation or death of a resident, the vacancy may be filled by a consumer who meets the requirements of paragraph (1).

(3) If there is no resident residing in a developmental center from any regional center who meets the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), a vacancy may be filled by a consumer of any regional center who does not reside in a developmental center if the consumer otherwise meets the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), the regional center demonstrates that the placement is necessary to protect the consumer’s health or safety, and the department has granted prior
 written authorization.

(c) The ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN shall not admit a consumer if the individual health care plan team determines that the consumer is likely to exhibit behaviors posing a threat of substantial harm to others, or has a serious health condition that is unpredictable or unstable. A determination that the individual is a threat to others may only be based on objective evidence or recent behavior and a determination that the threat cannot be mitigated by reasonable interventions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 40.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.68.

(a) The individual health care plan shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) An evaluation of the consumer’s current health.

(2) A description of the consumer’s ability to perform the activities of daily living.

(3) A list of all current prescription and nonprescription medications the consumer is using.

(4) A list of all health care and intensive support services the consumer is currently receiving or may need upon placement in the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN.

(5) A written statement from the consumer’s primary care physician familiar with the health care needs of the consumer, or other physician as designated by the regional center, that the consumer’s medical condition is predictable and stable, and that the consumer’s level of care is appropriate for the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN.

(6) Provision for the consumer to be examined by the consumer’s primary care physician at least once every 60 days, or more frequently if indicated.

(7) A list of the appropriate professionals assigned to provide the health care as described in the plan.

(8) A description of, and plan for providing, any training required for all direct care personnel to meet individuals’ needs.

(9) The name of the individual health care plan team member, and an alternate designee, who is responsible for day-to-day monitoring of the consumer’s health care plan and ensuring its implementation as written.

(10) Identification of the legally authorized
 representative to make health care decisions on the consumer’s behalf, if the consumer lacks the capacity to give informed consent.

(11) The name and telephone number of the person or persons to notify in case of an emergency.

(12) The next meeting date of the individual health care plan team, that shall be at least every six months, to evaluate and update the individual health care plan.

(b) In addition to Section 80075 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and if applicable for a GHCSHN, Sections 84075 and 84275 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, the ARFPSHN and the GHCSHN shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Medications shall be given
 only on the order of a person lawfully authorized to prescribe.

(2) Medications shall be administered as prescribed and shall be recorded in the consumer record. The name and title of the person administering the medication or treatment, and the date, time, and dosage of the medication administered shall be recorded. Initials may be used provided the signature of the person administering the medication or treatment is recorded on the medication or treatment record.

(3) Preparation of dosages for more than one scheduled administration time shall not be permitted.

(4) Persons administering medications shall confirm each consumer’s identity prior to the administration.

(5) Medications shall be administered within two hours after dosages are prepared and
 shall be administered by the same person who prepared the dosages. Dosages shall be administered within one hour of the prescribed time unless otherwise indicated by the prescriber.

(6) All medications shall be administered only by those persons specifically authorized to do so by their respective scope of practice, with the exception of emergency medical assistance and injections for severe diabetic hypoglycemia and anaphylactic shock as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1507.25 of the Health and Safety Code.

(7) No medication shall be administered to or used by any consumer other than the consumer for whom the medication was prescribed.

(8) Medication errors and adverse drug reactions shall be recorded and reported immediately to the practitioner who ordered the drug or another practitioner responsible for the medical care of the consumer. Minor adverse reactions that are identified in the literature accompanying the product as a usual or common side effect, need not be reported to the practitioner immediately, but in all cases shall be recorded in the consumer’s record. Medication errors include, but are not limited to, the failure to administer a drug ordered by a prescriber within one hour of the time prescribed, administration of any drugs other than prescribed or the administration of a dose not prescribed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 41.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.70.

(a) The State Department of Social Services, in administering the licensing program, shall not have any responsibility for evaluating consumers’ level of care or health care provided by an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN. Any suspected deficiencies in a consumer’s level of care or health care identified by the State Department of Social Services’ personnel shall be reported immediately to the appropriate regional center and the State Department of Developmental Services for investigation.

(b) The regional center shall have responsibility for monitoring and evaluating the implementation of the consumer’s individual plan objectives, including, but not limited to, the health care and intensive support service needs identified in the consumer’s individual health care plan and the consumer’s integration and participation in community life.

(c) For each consumer placed in an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN, the regional center shall assign a service coordinator pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4647.

(d) A regional center licensed registered nurse shall visit, with or without prior notice, the consumer, in person, at least monthly in the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN, or more frequently if specified in the consumer’s individual health care plan. At least four of these visits, annually, shall be unannounced.

(e) The State Department of Developmental Services shall monitor and ensure the regional centers’ compliance with the requirements of this article. The monitoring shall include onsite visits to all the ARFPSHNs and the GHCSHNs at least every six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 42.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.73.

(a) In addition to any other contract termination provisions, a regional center may terminate its contract with an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN if the regional center determines that the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN is unable to maintain substantial compliance with state laws, regulations, or its contract with the regional center, or the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN demonstrates an inability to ensure the health and safety of the consumers.

(b) The ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN may appeal a regional center’s decision to terminate its contract by sending, to the executive director of the contracting regional
 center, a detailed statement containing the reasons and facts demonstrating why the termination is inappropriate. The appeal must be received by the regional center within 10 working days from the date of the letter terminating the contract. The executive director shall respond with their decision within 10 working days of the date of receipt of the appeal from the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN. The executive director shall submit their decision to the State Department of Developmental Services on the same date that it is signed. The decision of the executive director shall be the final administrative decision.

(c) The Director of Developmental Services may rescind an ARFPSHN’s or a GHCSHN’s program certification if, in their sole discretion, an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN does not maintain substantial compliance with an applicable statute, regulation, or ordinance, or cannot ensure the health and safety of the consumers. The decision of the Director of Developmental Services shall be the final administrative decision. The Director of Developmental Services shall transmit their decision rescinding an ARFPSHN’s or a GHCSHN’s program certification to the State Department of Social Services and the regional center with their recommendation as to whether to revoke the ARFPSHN’s or the GHCSHN’s license.

(d) In addition to complying with Section 1524.1 of the Health and Safety Code, an ARFPSHN or GHCSHN licensee that is unable to continue to provide services to consumers in the facility shall, upon the date on which a new ARFPSHN license is issued pursuant to Sections 1520 and 1525 of the Health and Safety Code, or a new GHCSHN license is issued pursuant to Sections 1520, 1520.1, and 1525 of the Health and Safety Code, arrange with the regional center or department the transfer of all information, property, and documents related to the operation of the facility and the provision of services to the consumers. The department or the regional center shall take all steps permitted by this article to ensure that at
 all times the consumers who are residing in the facility receive services set forth in their individual health care plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 43.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.74.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall only approve the development of ARFPSHNs or GHCSHNs that are directly associated with the identification of the need of regional center consumers residing in or at risk of placement in larger congregate settings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 44.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.75.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services may adopt emergency regulations to implement this article. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the State Department of Developmental Services is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe specific facts showing the need for immediate action. A certificate of compliance for these implementing regulations shall be filed within 24 months following the adoption of the first emergency regulations filed pursuant to this section.

(b) This article shall only be implemented to the extent that funds are made available through an appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 717, Sec. 135.   (SB 853)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.76.

For a child or nonminor dependent who has been adjudged a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300, a child who has not been adjudged a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300 but who is in the custody of the county welfare department, or a child who has been adjudged a ward of the court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 and placed in the care and custody of the county probation department, who is or will be placed in a GHCSHN, the following shall apply:

(a) The child or nonminor dependent shall have a predictable and stable condition, as determined by the individualized health care plan team, that can rapidly deteriorate, resulting in permanent injury or death, or that is dependent upon one or more of the following:

(1) Nutrition support, including enteral feeding tube or total parenteral feeding.

(2) Cardiorespiratory monitoring.

(3) Oxygen support.

(4) A ventilator.

(5) Nursing interventions for tracheostomy care and suctioning.

(6) Nursing interventions for colostomy, ileostomy, or other medical or surgical procedures.

(7) Special medication regimes including injection and intravenous medications.

(8) Urinary catheterization.

(9) Renal
 dialysis.

(b) The child or nonminor dependent has been assessed pursuant to Section 4096 and it is determined that the GHCSHN will provide the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child or nonminor dependent in the least restrictive environment and be consistent with the short- and long-term goals for the child or nonminor dependent.

(c) In addition to the individuals identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 4684.50, the individual health care plan team shall, at a minimum, include:

(1) Any person who holds the right to make developmental services decisions for the child, including any person designated by the court pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (j) of Section 319 or paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.

(2) The child welfare caseworker.

(3) A representative of the child or nonminor dependent’s tribe or Indian custodian, as applicable.

(d) The child welfare agency shall continue to be responsible to make all efforts required by law to complete any steps necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child or nonminor dependent, including, but not limited to, the provision of specialized permanency services as defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501.

(e) The child welfare agency shall review whether the child can be transitioned to a less restrictive environment pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (e) of Section 361.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 45.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.77.

(a) If a child requires a living arrangement in a GHCSHN, the regional center shall make every effort to secure placement, consistent with the individual program plan, in a GHCSHN that is reasonably close proximity to the home of the legal guardian.

(b) (1) If a GHCSHN in reasonably close proximity to the home of the family or guardian cannot be secured by the regional center, the regional center shall include with the individual program plan a written statement of its efforts to locate, develop, or adapt appropriate services and supports in a living arrangement within close proximity to the family home and what steps will be taken by the regional center to develop the services and supports necessary to return the
 child to the family home or within close proximity of the family home. 

(2) The statement required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be updated every six months, or as agreed to by the parents or guardians, and a copy shall be forwarded to the parents or guardians of the minor and to the director of the department.

(c) This section shall not be construed to impede the movement of consumers to other geographic areas or the preference of the legal guardian for the placement of their minor child.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 46.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.6. Enhanced Behavioral Supports Homes [4684.80. - 4684.86.]

4684.80.

(a) “Enhanced behavioral supports home” means a facility certified by the State Department of Developmental Services and licensed by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 1567.62 of the Health and Safety Code as an adult residential facility or a group home that provides 24-hour nonmedical care to individuals with developmental disabilities who require enhanced behavioral supports, staffing, and supervision in a homelike setting. An enhanced behavioral supports home shall have a maximum capacity of four consumers, and shall conform to Section 441.530(a)(1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The enhanced behavioral support home shall be eligible for federal Medicaid home- and community-based services funding, unless the State Department of Developmental Services approves the use of delayed
 egress devices with secured perimeters to be utilized at the enhanced behavioral supports home pursuant to Section 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Enhanced behavioral services and supports” means additional staffing supervision, facility characteristics, or other services and supports to address a consumer’s challenging behaviors, which are beyond what is typically available in other community facilities licensed as an adult residential facility or a group home to serve individuals in a community setting rather than an institution.

(c) “Individual behavior supports plan” means the plan that identifies and documents the behavior and intensive support and service needs of a consumer and details the strategies to be employed and services to be provided to address those needs, and includes the entity responsible for providing those services and timelines for when each
 identified individual behavior support will commence.

(d) “Individual behavior supports team” means those individuals who develop, monitor, and revise the individual behavior supports plan for consumers residing in an enhanced behavioral supports home. The team shall, at a minimum, be composed of all of the following individuals:

(1) Regional center service coordinator and other regional center representatives, as necessary.

(2) Consumer and, where appropriate, his or her conservator or authorized representative.

(3) Service provider’s board-certified behavior analyst or qualified behavior modification professional.

(4) Enhanced behavioral supports home administrator.

(5) Regional center clients’ rights advocate, unless the consumer objects on his or her own behalf to participation by the clients’ rights advocate.

(6) Others deemed necessary by the consumer, or his or her conservator or authorized representative, for developing a comprehensive and effective individual behavior supports plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 18, Sec. 18.   (AB 107)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.81.

(a) The department shall use community placement plan and community resource development plan funds, as appropriated in the State Department of Developmental Services’ annual budget, to develop enhanced behavioral supports in homelike community settings. The enhanced behavioral supports homes shall be for purposes of providing intensive behavioral services and supports to adults and children with developmental disabilities who need intensive services and supports due to
 complex behaviors that cannot be managed in a community setting without the availability of enhanced behavioral services and supports, and who are at risk of institutionalization or out-of-state placement, or are transitioning to the community from a developmental center, other state-operated residential facility, institution for mental disease, or out-of-state placement.

(b) An enhanced behavioral supports home may only be established in an adult residential facility or a group home approved through a regional center community placement plan pursuant to former Section 4418.25, as that section read on June 30, 2026, or a
 regional center community resource development plan pursuant to Section 4418.25.

(c) Enhanced behavioral supports homes may be approved by the State Department of Developmental Services each fiscal year to the extent funding is available for this purpose, each for no more than four individuals with developmental disabilities. The homes shall be located throughout the state, as determined by the State Department of Developmental Services, based on regional center requests.

(d) Each enhanced behavioral supports home shall be licensed as an adult residential facility or a group home pursuant to the California Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and certified by the State Department of Developmental Services, shall exceed the minimum requirements for a Residential Facility Service
 Level 4-i pursuant to Sections 56004 and 56013 of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, and shall meet all applicable statutory and regulatory requirements applicable to a facility licensed as an adult residential facility or a group home for facility licensing, seclusion, and restraint, including Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 1180) of the Health and Safety Code, and the use of behavior modification interventions, subject to any additional requirements applicable to enhanced behavioral supports homes established by statute or by regulation promulgated pursuant to this article and Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 1567.61) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) A regional center shall not place a consumer in an enhanced behavioral supports home unless the program is certified by the State Department of Developmental Services and the facility is licensed by the
 State Department of Social Services.

(f) The State Department of Developmental Services shall be responsible for granting the certificate of program approval for an enhanced behavioral supports home.

(g) The State Department of Developmental Services may, pursuant to Section 4684.85, decertify any enhanced behavioral supports home that does not comply with program requirements. Upon decertification of an enhanced behavioral supports home, the State Department of Developmental Services shall report the decertification to the State Department of Social Services. The State Department of Social Services shall revoke the license of the enhanced behavioral supports home that has been decertified pursuant to Section 1550 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) If the State Department of Developmental Services determines that
 urgent action is necessary to protect a consumer residing in an enhanced behavioral supports home from physical or mental abuse, abandonment, or any other substantial threat to the consumer’s health and safety, the State Department of Developmental Services may request that the regional center or centers remove the consumer from the enhanced behavioral supports home or direct the regional center or centers to obtain alternative or additional services for the consumers within 24 hours of that determination. When possible, an individual program plan (IPP) meeting shall be convened to determine the appropriate action pursuant to this section. In any case, an IPP meeting shall be convened within 30 days following an action pursuant to this section.

(i) Enhanced behavioral supports homes shall have a facility program plan approved by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(1) No later than December 1, 2017, the department shall develop guidelines regarding the use of restraint or containment in enhanced behavioral supports homes, which shall be maintained in the facility program plan and plan of operation. In the development of these guidelines, the department shall consult with both of following:

(A) The appropriate professionals regarding the use of restraint or containment in enhanced behavioral supports homes.

(B) The protection and advocacy agency described in subdivision (i) of Section 4900 regarding appropriate safeguards for the protection of clients’ rights.

(2) The requirements of paragraph (1) shall not apply to enhanced behavioral supports homes that are certified and licensed prior to January 1, 2018, or prior to the adoption of the guidelines required in
 paragraph (1), whichever is sooner. However, these homes shall meet the requirements of paragraph (1) no later than 30 days following adoption of the guidelines.

(3) An enhanced behavioral supports home shall include in its facility program plan a description of how it will ensure physical restraint or containment will not be used as an extended procedure in accordance with this section, subdivision (h) of Section 1180.4 of the Health and Safety Code, and any other applicable law or regulation.

(4) The facility program plan approved by the State Department of Developmental Services shall be submitted to the State Department of Social Services for inclusion in the facility plan of operation.

(5) The vendoring regional center and each consumer’s regional center shall have joint responsibility for monitoring and
 evaluating the services provided in the enhanced behavioral supports home. Monitoring shall include at least quarterly, or more frequently if specified in the consumer’s individual program plan, face-to-face, onsite case management visits with each consumer by the consumer’s regional center and at least quarterly quality assurance visits by the vendoring regional center. The State Department of Developmental Services shall monitor and ensure the regional centers’ compliance with their monitoring responsibilities.

(j) The State Department of Developmental Services shall establish by regulation a rate methodology for enhanced behavioral supports homes that includes a fixed facility component for residential services and an individualized services and supports component based on each consumer’s needs as determined through the individual program plan process, which may include assistance with transitioning to a less restrictive community
 residential setting.

(k) (1) The established facility rate for a full month of service, as defined in regulations adopted pursuant to this article, shall be paid based on the licensed capacity of the facility once the facility reaches maximum capacity, despite the temporary absence of one or more consumers from the facility or subsequent temporary vacancies created by consumers moving from the facility. Prior to the facility reaching licensed capacity, the facility rate shall be prorated based on the number of consumers residing in the facility.

When a consumer is temporarily absent from the facility, including when a consumer is in need for inpatient care in a health facility, as defined in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, the regional center may, based on consumer need, continue to fund individual services, in addition to paying the
 facility rate. Individual consumer services funded by the regional center during a consumer’s absence from the facility shall be approved by the regional center director and shall only be approved in 14-day increments. The regional center shall maintain documentation of the need for these services and the regional center director’s approval.

(2) An enhanced behavioral supports home using delayed egress devices, in compliance with Section 1531.1 of the Health and Safety Code, may utilize secured perimeters, in compliance with Section 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code and applicable regulations. No more than 11 enhanced behavioral supports homes that use delayed egress devices in combination with a secured perimeter shall be certified. Enhanced behavioral supports homes shall be counted for purposes of the statewide limit established in regulations on the total number of beds permitted in homes with delayed egress devices in combination with
 secured perimeters pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 14.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.82.

The vendoring regional center shall, before placing any consumer into an enhanced behavioral supports home, ensure that the home has a license issued by the State Department of Social Services for not more than four individuals with developmental disabilities, is certified by the State Department of Developmental Services, and has a contract with the regional center that meets the contracting requirements established by the State Department of Developmental Services through regulations promulgated pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 27.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.83.

The enhanced behavioral supports home provider shall be responsible for coordinating the development and updating of each consumer’s individual behavior supports plan with the consumer’s individual behavior supports team. The initial individual behavior supports plan shall be developed within one week of the consumer’s admission to the enhanced behavioral supports home.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 30, Sec. 18.   (SB 856)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.84.

(a) The regional center shall have responsibility for monitoring and evaluating the implementation of the consumer’s individual behavior supports plan objectives.

(b) A regional center qualified behavior modification professional shall visit, with or without notice, the consumer, in person, at least monthly in the enhanced behavioral supports home, or more frequently if specified in the consumer’s individual behavior supports plan. At least four of these visits, annually, shall be unannounced.

(c) The State Department of Developmental Services shall monitor and ensure the regional centers’ compliance with the requirements of this
 article. The monitoring shall include onsite visits to all the enhanced behavioral supports homes at least every six months for the duration of the pilot project.

(d) The State Department of Developmental Services shall conduct a review of the pilot project in consultation with stakeholders. The review shall be completed and the results of the review shall be shared in writing with the State Department of Social Services no later than September 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 30, Sec. 18.   (SB 856)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.85.

(a) In addition to any other contract termination provisions, a regional center may terminate its contract with an enhanced behavioral supports home when the regional center determines that the home is unable to maintain substantial compliance with state laws, regulations, or its contract with the regional center, or the home demonstrates an inability to ensure the health and safety of the consumers.

(b) The enhanced behavioral supports home may appeal a regional center’s decision to terminate its contract by sending to the executive director of the contracting regional center a detailed statement containing the reasons and facts demonstrating why the termination is inappropriate. The appeal shall be
 received by the regional center within 10 working days from the date of the letter terminating the contract. The executive director shall respond with his or her decision within 10 working days of the date of receipt of the appeal from the enhanced behavioral supports home. The executive director shall submit his or her decision to the State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of Social Services on the same date that it is signed. The decision of the executive director shall be the final administrative decision.

(c) The Director of Developmental Services may rescind an enhanced behavioral supports home program certification when, in his or her sole discretion, an enhanced behavioral supports home does not maintain substantial compliance with an applicable statute, regulation, or ordinance, or cannot ensure the health and safety of the consumers. The decision of the Director of Developmental Services shall be the final
 administrative decision. The Director of Developmental Services shall transmit his or her decision whether to rescind an enhanced behavioral supports home program certification to the State Department of Social Services and the regional center with his or her recommendation as to whether to revoke the enhanced behavioral supports home’s residential care facility license, for which the State Department of Social Services shall revoke the license of the enhanced behavioral supports home pursuant to Section 1550 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The State Department of Developmental Services and regional centers shall, for purposes of assisting in licensing, provide the State Department of Social Services with all available documentation and evidentiary support that was submitted to the State Department of Developmental Services in connection with certification by an applicant for licensure under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 30, Sec. 18.   (SB 856)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.86.

(a) A certification for an enhanced behavioral supports home shall not be issued before emergency regulations filed by the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to this article have been published. These regulations shall be developed in consultation with stakeholders, including the State Department of Social Services, consumer advocates, and regional centers. The regulations shall address at least the following:

(1) Program standards, including program design requirements, staffing structure, staff qualifications, and training. Training requirements shall include:

(A) A minimum of 16 hours of emergency intervention